Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
§ 4.1-101.010.
Exemption of Authority from personnel and procurement procedures; information systems; etc.

The provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) and the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) shall not apply to the Authority in the exercise of any power conferred under this subtitle. Nor shall the provisions of Chapter 20.1 (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) of Title 2.2 or Article 2 (§

51.1-1104

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 51.1 apply to the Authority in the exercise of any power conferred under this subtitle.

To effect its implementation, the Authority’s procurement of goods, services, insurance, and construction and the disposition of surplus materials shall be exempt from:

State agency requirements regarding disposition of surplus materials and distribution of proceeds from the sale or recycling of surplus materials under §§

2.2-1124

and

2.2-1125

;

The requirement to purchase from the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired under §

2.2-1117

; and

Any other state statutes, rules, regulations, or requirements relating to the procurement of goods, services, insurance, and construction, including Article 3 (§

2.2-1109

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 2.2, regarding the duties, responsibilities, and authority of the Division of Purchases and Supply of the Virginia Department of General Services, and Article 4 (§

2.2-1129

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 2.2, regarding the review and the oversight by the Division of Engineering and Buildings of the Department of General Services of contracts for the construction of the Authority’s capital projects and construction-related professional services under §

2.2-1132

.

The Authority (i) may purchase from and participate in all statewide contracts for goods and services, including information technology goods and services; (ii) shall use directly or by integration or interface the Commonwealth’s electronic procurement system subject to the terms and conditions agreed upon between the Authority and the Department of General Services; and (iii) shall post on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website all Invitations to Bid, Requests for Proposal, sole source award notices, and emergency award notices to ensure visibility and access to the Authority’s procurement opportunities on one website.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 698, 707.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, and designated the existing paragraph as subsection A; in subsection A, inserted “or Article 2 (§

51.1-1104

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 51.1”; and added subsections B and C.

§ 4.1-101.011.
Reversion to the Commonwealth.

In the event of the dissolution of the Authority, all assets of the Authority, after satisfaction of creditors, shall revert to the Commonwealth.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2105, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 4.1-101.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail; electronic communications as alternative to regular mail; limitation.

Whenever in this subtitle the Board is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board may be sent by regular mail.

Except as provided in subsection C, whenever in this subtitle the Board is required or permitted to send any mail, notice, or other official communication by regular mail to persons licensed under Chapter 2 (§

4.1-200

et seq.), upon the request of a licensee, the Board may instead send such mail, notice, or official communication by email, text message, or other electronic means to the email address, telephone number, or other contact information provided to the Board by the licensee, provided that the Board retains sufficient proof of the electronic delivery, which may be an electronic receipt of delivery or a certificate of service prepared by the Board confirming the electronic delivery.

No notice required by §

4.1-227

to (i) a licensee of a hearing that may result in the suspension or revocation of his license or the imposition of a civil penalty or (ii) a person holding a permit shall be sent by the Board by email, text message, or other electronic means, nor shall any decision by the Board to suspend or revoke a license or permit or impose a civil penalty be sent by the Board by email, text message, or other electronic means.

History.

2011, c. 566; 2015, c. 412.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 added the subsection A designation and added subsections B and C.

§ 4.1-102.
Repealed by Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 3,
effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s note.

Former §

4.1-102

, which pertained to membership of Board, derived from Code 1950, § 4-4; 1970, c. 756; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1974, c. 460; 1976, c. 64; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-103.
General powers of Board.

The Board shall have the power to:

Sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts;

Adopt, use, and alter at will a common seal;

Fix, alter, charge, and collect rates, rentals, fees, and other charges for the use of property of, the sale of products of, or services rendered by the Authority at rates to be determined by the Authority for the purpose of providing for the payment of the expenses of the Authority;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties, the furtherance of its purposes, and the execution of its powers under this subtitle, including agreements with any person or federal agency;

Employ, at its discretion, consultants, researchers, architects, engineers, accountants, financial experts, investment bankers, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and special agents as may be necessary and fix their compensation to be payable from funds made available to the Authority. Legal services for the Authority shall be provided by the Attorney General in accordance with Chapter 5 (§

2.2-500

et seq.) of Title 2.2;

Receive and accept from any federal or private agency, foundation, corporation, association, or person grants or other aid to be expended in accomplishing the objectives of the Authority, and receive and accept from the Commonwealth or any state and any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof or from any other source aid or contributions of either money, property, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with state law, and all state moneys accepted under this section shall be expended by the Authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the Commonwealth;

Adopt, alter, and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business shall be transacted and the manner in which the powers of the Authority shall be exercised and its duties performed. The Board may delegate or assign any duty or task to be performed by the Authority to any officer or employee of the Authority. The Board shall remain responsible for the performance of any such duties or tasks. Any delegation pursuant to this subdivision shall, where appropriate, be accompanied by written guidelines for the exercise of the duties or tasks delegated. Where appropriate, the guidelines shall require that the Board receive summaries of actions taken. Such delegation or assignment shall not relieve the Board of the responsibility to ensure faithful performance of the duties and tasks;

Conduct or engage in any lawful business, activity, effort, or project consistent with the Authority’s purposes or necessary or convenient to exercise its powers;

Develop policies and procedures generally applicable to the procurement of goods, services, and construction, based upon competitive principles;

Develop policies and procedures consistent with Article 4 (§

2.2-4347

et seq.) of Chapter 43 of Title 2.2;

Buy, import and sell alcoholic beverages other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries, and to have alcoholic beverages other than beer and wine not produced by farm wineries in its possession for sale;

Buy and sell any mixers;

Buy and sell products licensed by the Virginia Tourism Corporation that are within international trademark classes 16 (paper goods and printer matters), 18 (leather goods), 21 (housewares and glass), and 25 (clothing);

Control the possession, sale, transportation, and delivery of alcoholic beverages;

Determine, subject to §

4.1-121

, the localities within which government stores shall be established or operated and the location of such stores;

Maintain warehouses for alcoholic beverages and control the storage and delivery of alcoholic beverages to and from such warehouses;

Acquire, purchase, hold, use, lease, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of the Authority; lease as lessee any property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, at such annual rental and on such terms and conditions as may be determined by the Board; lease as lessor to any person any property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, at any time acquired by the Authority, whether wholly or partially completed, at such annual rental and on such terms and conditions as may be determined by the Board; sell, transfer, or convey any property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, at any time acquired or held by the Authority on such terms and conditions as may be determined by the Board; and occupy and improve any land or building required for the purposes of this subtitle;

Purchase, lease, or acquire the use of, by any manner, any plant or equipment that may be considered necessary or useful in carrying into effect the purposes of this subtitle, including rectifying, blending, and processing plants. The Board may purchase, build, lease, and operate distilleries and manufacture alcoholic beverages;

Determine the nature, form and capacity of all containers used for holding alcoholic beverages to be kept or sold under this subtitle, and prescribe the form and content of all labels and seals to be placed thereon; however, no container sold in or shipped into the Commonwealth shall include powdered or crystalline alcohol;

Appoint every agent and employee required for its operations; require any or all of them to give bonds payable to the Commonwealth in such penalty as shall be fixed by the Board; and engage the services of experts and professionals;

Hold and conduct hearings; issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, memoranda, papers and other documents before the Board or any agent of the Board; and administer oaths and take testimony thereunder. The Board may authorize any Board member or agent of the Board to hold and conduct hearings, issue subpoenas, administer oaths and take testimony thereunder, and decide cases, subject to final decision by the Board, on application of any party aggrieved. The Board may enter into consent agreements and may request and accept from any applicant or licensee a consent agreement in lieu of proceedings on (i) objections to the issuance of a license or (ii) disciplinary action. Any such consent agreement shall include findings of fact and may include an admission or a finding of a violation. A consent agreement shall not be considered a case decision of the Board and shall not be subject to judicial review under the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), but may be considered by the Board in future disciplinary proceedings;

Make a reasonable charge for preparing and furnishing statistical information and compilations to persons other than (i) officials, including court and police officials, of the Commonwealth and of its subdivisions if the information requested is for official use and (ii) persons who have a personal or legal interest in obtaining the information requested if such information is not to be used for commercial or trade purposes;

Promulgate regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and §

4.1-111

;

Grant, suspend, and revoke licenses for the manufacture, bottling, distribution, importation, and sale of alcoholic beverages;

Assess and collect civil penalties and civil charges for violations of this subtitle and Board regulations;

Maintain actions to enjoin common nuisances as defined in §

4.1-317

;

Establish minimum food sale requirements for all retail licensees;

Review and approve any proposed legislative or regulatory changes suggested by the Chief Executive Officer as the Board deems appropriate;

Report quarterly to the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security on the law-enforcement activities undertaken to enforce the provisions of this subtitle;

Establish and collect fees for all permits set forth in this subtitle, including fees associated with applications for such permits;

Impose a requirement that a mixed beverage casino licensee pursuant to subdivision A 15 of §

4.1-206.3

pay for any cost incurred by the Board to enforce such license in excess of the applicable state license fee; and

Do all acts necessary or advisable to carry out the purposes of this subtitle.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-7; 1974, c. 460; 1982, c. 647; 1984, c. 200; 1993, c. 866; 1996, c. 558; 2015, cc. 25, 38, 730, 735; 2016, c. 21; 2017, cc. 698, 707; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2022, cc. 589, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2017, cc, 698 and
707, cl. 5 provides: “That prior to July 1, 2018, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (the Department) shall enter into an operating agreement whereby employees and special agents of the Department are authorized to exercise the powers and duties conferred by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board that are incidental to their employment or agency with the Department and conferred upon the Board of Directors of the Authority in accordance with
§

4.1-103

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts
2019, cc. 810 and
811, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Directors (the Board) of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall have the power to employ or retain in-house legal counsel to advise or represent the Authority in hearings, controversies, or other matters involving the interests of the Authority; however, upon request by the Board, the Attorney General shall provide legal services for the Authority in accordance with Chapter 5 ( §

2.2-500

et seq.) of Title 2.2.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 9 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 25 and 735, effective April 15, 2015, are identical and in subdivision 9, inserted “however, no container sold in or shipped into the Commonwealth shall include powdered or crystalline alcohol” at the end.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and added subdivisions 1 through 10 and 28 and 29 and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly; rewrote subdivision 16, which read “Lease, occupy and improve any land or building required for the purposes of this title”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and deleted subdivision 18 which read: “Purchase or otherwise acquire title to any land or building required for the purposes of this title and sell and convey the same by proper deed, with the consent of the Governor” and renumbered accordingly; inserted subdivisions 30 and 31 and renumbered accordingly and made stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 21 added subdivision 3 and renumbered remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and deleted subdivision 18 which read: “Purchase or otherwise acquire title to any land or building required for the purposes of this title and sell and convey the same by proper deed, with the consent of the Governor” and renumbered accordingly; inserted subdivisions 30 and 31 and renumbered accordingly and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, and in subdivision 5, inserted “special” preceding “agents”; in subdivision 7, added the last five sentences; and in subdivision 22, substituted “decide cases” for “make summary decisions” and added the last three sentences.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and deleted subdivision 18 which read: “Purchase or otherwise acquire title to any land or building required for the purposes of this title and sell and convey the same by proper deed, with the consent of the Governor” and renumbered accordingly; inserted subdivisions 30 and 31 and renumbered accordingly and made stylistic changes.

Cross references.

As to Virginia Tourism Corporation and the Virginia Tourism Authority Act, see §

2.2-2315

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and substituted “mixed beverage casino licensee pursuant to subdivision A 15 of §

4.1-206.3

pay for any cost” for “mixed beverage restaurant licensee located on the premises of and operated by a casino gaming establishment pay for any cost” in subdivision 31.

§ 4.1-103.01.
Additional powers; access to certain tobacco sales records; inspections; penalty.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

58.1-3

or any other provision of law, the Tax Commissioner shall provide to the Board the name, address, and other identifying information within his possession of all wholesale cigarette dealers.

All invoices, books, papers or other memoranda and records concerning the sale of cigarettes maintained by wholesale cigarette dealers pursuant to §

58.1-1007

shall be subject to inspection during normal business hours by special agents of the Board. Any person who, upon request by a special agent, unreasonably fails or refuses to allow an inspection of the records authorized by this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The Board may use the information obtained from the Tax Commissioner or by the inspections authorized by subsection B only for the purpose of creating and maintaining a list of retail dealers to facilitate enforcement of the laws governing the sale of tobacco products to minors. Neither the Board nor any special agent shall divulge any information provided by the Tax Commissioner or obtained in the performance of the inspections authorized by subsection B to anyone other than to another special agent. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1998, cc. 189, 364.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-103.02.
Additional powers; substance abuse prevention; Virginia Institutions of Higher Education Substance Use Advisory Committee established.

It shall be the responsibility of the Board to administer a substance abuse prevention program within the Commonwealth and to (i) coordinate substance abuse prevention activities of agencies of the Commonwealth in such program, (ii) review substance abuse prevention program expenditures by agencies of the Commonwealth, and (iii) determine the direction and appropriateness of such expenditures. The Board shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies, private and public agencies, interested organizations, and individuals in order to prevent substance abuse within the Commonwealth. The Board shall report annually by December 1 of each year to the Governor and the General Assembly on the substance abuse prevention activities of the Commonwealth.

The Board shall also establish and appoint members to the Virginia Institutions of Higher Education Substance Use Advisory Committee (Advisory Committee). The goal of the Advisory Committee shall be to develop and update a statewide strategic plan for substance use education, prevention, and intervention at Virginia’s public and private institutions of higher education. The strategic plan shall (a) incorporate the use of best practices, which may include, but not be limited to, student-led peer-to-peer education and college or other institution of higher education recovery programs; (b) provide for the collection of statewide data from all institutions of higher education on student alcohol and substance use; (c) assist institutions of higher education in developing their individual strategic plans by providing networking and training resources and materials; and (d) develop and maintain reporting guidelines for use by institutions of higher education in their individual strategic plans.

The Advisory Committee shall consist of representatives from Virginia’s public and private institutions of higher education, including students and directors of student health, and such other members as the Board may deem appropriate. The Advisory Committee’s membership shall be broadly representative of individuals from both public and private institutions of higher education.

The Advisory Committee shall submit an annual report on its activities to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before December 1 each year.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835; 2018, cc. 210, 211.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 103, enacted this section, effective July 1, 2012.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 17 provides: “That the Secretaries of Agriculture and Forestry, Health and Human Resources, and Public Safety and Homeland Security shall convene a work group with all appropriate state agencies and authorities to develop a plan for identifying and collecting data that can determine the use and misuse of marijuana in order to determine appropriate policies and programs to promote public health and safety. The plan shall include marijuana-related data regarding (i) poison control center calls; (ii) hospital and emergency room visits; (iii) impaired driving; (iv) use rates, including heavy or frequent use, mode of use, and demographic information for vulnerable populations, including youth and pregnant women; and (v) treatment rates for cannabis use disorder and any other diseases related to marijuana use. The plan shall detail the categories for which each data source will be collected, including the region where the individual lives or the incident occurred and the age and the race or ethnicity of the individual. The plan shall also include the means by which initial data will be collected as soon as practicable as a benchmark prior to or as soon as possible after the effective date of an act legalizing marijuana for adult use, the plan for regular collection of such data thereafter, and the cost of the initial and ongoing collection of such data. The plan shall also recommend a timetable and determine the cost for analyzing and reporting the data. The work group, in consultation with the Director of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion, shall also recommend metrics to identify disproportionate impacts of marijuana legalization, if any, to include discrimination in the Commonwealth’s cannabis industry. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by November 1, 2021. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 18 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Education (the Department), with assistance from appropriate agencies, local school divisions, and appropriate experts, shall implement a plan to ensure that teachers have access to sufficient information, resources, and lesson ideas to assist them in teaching about the harms of marijuana use among the youth and about substance abuse, as provided in the 2020 Health Standards of Learning. The Department shall (i) review resources currently provided to teachers to determine if additional or updated material or lesson ideas are needed and (ii) provide or develop any additional materials and resources deemed necessary and make the same available to teachers by January 1, 2024. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 19 provides: “That the Secretary of Education, in conjunction with the Virginia Department of Education, shall develop a plan for introducing teachers, particularly those teaching health, to the information and resources available to them to assist them in teaching the 2020 Health Standards of Learning as it relates to marijuana use. Such plan shall include providing professional development webinars as soon as practicable, as well as ongoing periodic professional development relating to marijuana, as well as alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs as appropriate. The plan shall include the estimated cost of implementation and any potential source of funds to cover such cost and shall be submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly by November 1, 2021. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 20 provides: “That the Secretary of Education, the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia, the Virginia Higher Education Substance Use Advisory Committee, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall work with existing collegiate recovery programs to determine what, if any, additional evidence-based efforts should be undertaken for college-age individuals to promote education and prevention strategies relating to marijuana. The plan shall include the estimated cost of implementation and any potential source of funds to cover such cost and shall be submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly by November 1, 2021. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 21 provides: “That, effective July 1, 2021, the Regulations Governing Pharmaceutical Processors (18VAC110-60) as promulgated or amended thereafter by the Board of Pharmacy (the Board) shall remain in full force and effect and continue to be administered by the Board of Pharmacy until the Board of Directors of the Virginia Cannabis Control Authority (the Authority) promulgates regulations pursuant to the tenth enactment of this act and no later than July 1, 2023. The Board shall provide assistance to the Board of Directors of the Authority in promulgating regulations by July 1, 2023. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 22 provides: “That there shall be established a Cannabis Oversight Commission (the Commission), which shall consist of 10 members of the General Assembly. Members shall be appointed as follows: six members of the House of Delegates who are members of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee for Courts of Justice, or the House Committee on General Laws to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates and four members of the Senate who are members of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, or the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership; however, the chairman and vice-chairman shall not both be members of the House of Delegates, nor shall both the chairman and vice-chairman be members of the Senate. No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the House members or a majority of the Senate members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission. The Commission shall exercise the function of overseeing the implementation of the provisions of this act and shall convene regularly in the exercise of that function. The Virginia Cannabis Control Authority (the Authority) shall report to the Commission at the Commission’s request. The Commission shall expire on January 1, 2024. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 210 and 211 are identical, and added the second, third, and fourth paragraphs.

§ 4.1-103.03.
Additional powers; mediation; alternative dispute resolution; confidentiality.

As used in this section:“Appropriate case” means any alleged license violation or objection to the application for a license in which it is apparent that there are significant issues of disagreement among interested persons and for which the Board finds that the use of a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding is in the public interest.“Dispute resolution proceeding” means the same as that term is defined in §

8.01-576.4

.“Mediation” means the same as that term is defined in §

8.01-576.4

.“Neutral” means the same as that term is defined in § 8.01-576.4.

The Board may use mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding in appropriate cases to resolve underlying issues or reach a consensus or compromise on contested issues. Mediation and other dispute resolution proceedings as authorized by this section shall be voluntary procedures that supplement, rather than limit, other dispute resolution techniques available to the Board. Mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding may be used for an objection to the issuance of a license only with the consent of, and participation by, the applicant for licensure and shall be terminated at the request of such applicant.

Any resolution of a contested issue accepted by the Board under this section shall be considered a consent agreement as provided in subdivision 21 of §

4.1-103

. The decision to use mediation or a dispute resolution proceeding is in the Board’s sole discretion and shall not be subject to judicial review.

The Board may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), for the implementation of this section. Such rules and regulations may include (i) standards and procedures for the conduct of mediation and dispute resolution proceedings, including an opportunity for interested persons identified by the Board to participate in the proceeding; (ii) the appointment and function of a neutral to encourage and assist parties to voluntarily compromise or settle contested issues; and (iii) procedures to protect the confidentiality of papers, work products, or other materials.

The provisions of §

8.01-576.10

concerning the confidentiality of a mediation or dispute resolution proceeding shall govern all such proceedings held pursuant to this section except where the Board uses or relies on information obtained in the course of such proceeding in granting a license, suspending or revoking a license, or accepting payment of a civil penalty or investigative costs. However, a consent agreement signed by the parties shall not be confidential.

History.

2017, cc. 698, 707; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “subdivision 21” for “subdivision 22” in subsection C in the first sentence.

§ 4.1-103.1.
Criminal history records check required on certain employees; reimbursement of costs.

All persons hired by the Authority whose job duties involve access to or handling of the Authority’s funds or merchandise shall be subject to a criminal history records check before, and as a condition of, employment.

The Board shall develop policies regarding the employment of persons who have been convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude.

The Department of State Police shall be reimbursed by the Authority for the cost of investigations conducted pursuant to this section.

History.

1994, c. 34; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 698, 707.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Persons” for “On or after July 1, 1994, all persons,” “Authority” for “Board” and “the Authority’s” for “departmental” in the first paragraph; added the second paragraph; and in the third paragraph, substituted “Authority” for “Board.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, and in the second paragraph, substituted “The Board shall develop policies regarding the employment of persons who have” for “No person who has” and deleted “shall be employed or appointed by the Authority” following “moral turpitude.”

§ 4.1-104.
Purchases by the Board.

The purchasing of alcoholic beverages and mixers, products used in connection with distilled spirits intended for resale, or products licensed by the Virginia Tourism Corporation as specified in §

4.1-103

intended for resale, the making of leases, and the purchasing of real estate by the Board under the provisions of this subtitle are exempt from the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 4-18; 1993, c. 866; 1996, c. 558; 2008, c. 135; 2016, c. 21.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 135 inserted “products used in connection with distilled spirits intended for resale.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 21 inserted “or products licensed by the Virginia Tourism Corporation as specified in §

4.1-103

intended for resale.”